Colorado statutes. TITLE 36 Natural Resources - General
PART 2
COLORADO STATE FOREST

36-7-201. Colorado state forest created - penalty.

There is hereby created the Colorado state forest, to consist of a consolidated area of forest lands to be selected by the state board of land commissioners, through exchange with the United States government.

The state board of land commissioners shall be authorized to exchange school, university, penitentiary, internal improvement, agricultural college, or any other state lands, either within or without the United States national forest, for other lands of at least equal area and appraised value, for the purpose of this section.

The state forest lands, when so selected, from time to time, by formal resolution of the board, shall be set aside and sale of any parcel or part thereof prohibited. The withdrawal from sale of such lands shall be so designated upon the records and plat books of the board in accordance with this section.

The board is authorized with the administration of the state forest lands; the leasing of the same for grazing, agricultural, mineral, and all other purposes to secure the maximum rental and revenue therefrom; to provide for and extend the practice of intensive forestry for its preservation; to sell, cut, and remove timber therefrom in accordance with good forestry practice; and to provide for protection against fire hazard.

The board shall prescribe and issue rules and regulations for the administration and leasing of such lands and for the preservation, conservation, cutting, and sale of timber thereon; and for the improvement of such lands, the building of trails, roads, and otherwise, and for the expense thereof.

The general assembly shall, from time to time, provide for the necessary expense of the administration and improvement of the state forest lands, by an appropriation for the operation of the board.

Any person or corporation who shall trespass, commit depredations, or by negligence be responsible for any fires, or who shall cut or remove any timber from the state forest lands without authority so to do from the board, commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 31:

pp. 350, 351, §§ 1-7.

CSA:

C. 134, § 131.

CRS 53:

§ 112-7-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-7-10.

L. 2021:

(7) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3289, § 670, effective March 1, 2022.

36-7-202. Board to designate state forests.

The board is authorized to designate as state forests units of land suitable in character and size for such purposes and to administer such state forests for the sustained yield of forest and range products therefrom. All moneys collected or acquired by the board from fees derived from the lease or rental of surface rights for grazing, commercial, or recreational purposes of state school trust lands located in state forests shall be paid over to the state treasurer to be deposited and transferred as follows: Seventy-five percent to the public school income fund of the state and twenty-five percent to the county public school fund of the county in which the land from which the moneys were derived is located.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 937, § 6.

CSA:

C. 134, § 131(6).

L. 41:

p. 598, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 112-7-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-7-11.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1348, § 1, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the public school income fund, as credited to the state public school fund, see § 22-54-114; for the public school fund, see §§ 3 and 5 of art. IX, Colo. Const., and article 41 of title 22; for the county public school fund, see § 22-54-113.